Nebraska, session 109, LB47.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB47 LB47
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 81-12,153, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-12,153 For purposes of the Business Innovation Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Economic Development;
(2) Economic redevelopment area means an area in the State of
Nebraska in which:
(a) The average rate of unemployment in the area during the period
covered by the most recent federal decennial census or American Community
Survey 5-Year Estimate by the United States Bureau of the Census is at
least one hundred fifty percent of the average rate of unemployment in
the state during the same period; and
(b) The average poverty rate in the area is twenty percent or more
for the federal census tract in the area;
(3) Federal grant program means the federal Small Business
Administration's Small Business Innovation Research grant program or
Small Business Technology Transfer grant program;
(4) Microenterprise means a for-profit business entity with not more
than ten full-time equivalent employees;
(5) Prototype means an original model on which something is
patterned by a resident of Nebraska or a company located in Nebraska; and
(6) Qualified census tract means a qualified census tract as defined
in 26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on January 1,
2025; and
(7) (6) Value-added agriculture means increasing the net worth of
food or nonfood agricultural products by processing, alternative
production and handling methods, collective marketing, or other
innovative practices.
Sec. 2. Section 81-12,162, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,162 (1) The department shall establish a small business
investment program. The program:
-2-

LB47 LB47
2025 2025
(a) Shall provide grants to microloan delivery organizations,
microloan technical assistance organizations, and innovation hubs to:
(i) Better assure that Nebraska's microenterprises are able to
realize their full potential to create jobs, enhance entrepreneurial
skills and activity, and increase low-income households' capacity to
become self-sufficient;
(ii) Provide funding to foster the creation of microenterprises;
(iii) Establish the department as the coordinating office for the
facilitation of microlending and microenterprise development;
(iv) Facilitate the development of a permanent, statewide
infrastructure of microlending support organizations to serve Nebraska's
microenterprise and self-employment sectors;
(v) Enable the department to provide grants to community-based
microenterprise development organizations in order to encourage the
development and growth of microenterprises throughout Nebraska; and
(vi) Enable the department to engage in contractual relationships
with statewide microlending support organizations and innovation hubs
which have the capacity to leverage additional nonstate funds for
microenterprise lending.
To the maximum extent possible, the selection process should assure
that the distribution of such financial assistance provides equitable
access to the benefits of the Business Innovation Act by all geographic
areas of the state; and
(b) May identify and coordinate other state and federal sources of
funds which may be available to the department to enhance the state's
ability to facilitate financial assistance pursuant to the program.
(2) To establish the criteria for making an award to a microloan
delivery organization, microloan technical assistance organization, or
innovation hub, the department shall consider:
(a) The plan for providing business development services and
microloans to microenterprises;
-3-

LB47 LB47
2025 2025
(b) The scope of services to be provided by the microloan delivery
organization, microloan technical assistance organization, or innovation
hub;
(c) The plan for coordinating the services and loans provided by the
microloan delivery organization, microloan technical assistance
organization, or innovation hub with commercial lending institutions;
(d) The geographic representation of all regions of the state,
including both urban and rural communities and neighborhoods;
(e) The ability of the microloan delivery organization, microloan
technical assistance organization, or innovation hub to provide for
business development in areas of chronic economic distress and low-income
regions of the state;
(f) The ability of the microloan delivery organization, microloan
technical assistance organization, or innovation hub to provide business
training and technical assistance to microenterprise clients;
(g) The ability of the microloan delivery organization, microloan
technical assistance organization, or innovation hub to monitor and
provide financial oversight of recipients of microloans; and
(h) Sources and sufficiency of operating funds for the
microenterprise development organization.
(3) Awards made by the department to a microloan delivery
organization, microloan technical assistance organization, or innovation
hub may be used to:
(a) Satisfy matching fund requirements for other federal or private
grants;
(b) Establish a revolving loan fund from which the microloan
delivery organization, microloan technical assistance organization, or
innovation hub may make loans to microenterprises;
(c) Establish a guaranty fund from which the microloan delivery
organization, microloan technical assistance organization, or innovation
hub may guarantee loans made by commercial lending institutions to
-4-

LB47 LB47
2025 2025
microenterprises;
(d) Provide funding for the operating costs of a microloan delivery
organization, microloan technical assistance organization, or innovation
hub not to exceed twenty percent; and
(e) Provide grants to establish loan-loss reserve funds to match
loan capital borrowed from other sources, including federal
microenterprise loan programs.
(4) Any award of financial assistance to a microloan delivery
organization, microloan technical assistance organization, or innovation
hub shall meet the following qualifications:
(a) Funds shall be matched by nonstate funds equivalent in money or
in-kind contributions or a combination of both equal to thirty-five
percent of the grant funds requested, except that this subdivision shall
not apply to grants awarded under subsection (5) of this section. Such
matching funds may be from any nonstate source, including private
foundations, federal or local government sources, quasi-governmental
entities, or commercial lending institutions, or any other funds whose
source does not include funds appropriated by the Legislature;
(b) Microloan funds shall be disbursed in microloans which do not
exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars or used to capitalize loan-loss
reserve funds for such loans; and
(c) A minimum of fifty percent of the microloan funds shall be used
by a microenterprise development assistance organization for small
business technical assistance.
(5)(a) Fifty percent of the grant funds available under this section
shall be reserved for microloan delivery organizations, microloan
technical assistance organizations, and innovation hubs that meet the
requirements of subdivision (b) of this subsection.
(b) A microloan delivery organization, microloan technical
assistance organization, or innovation hub shall be eligible for funding
under this subsection if:
-5-

LB47 LB47
2025 2025
(i) It is located within an economic redevelopment area or a
qualified census tract;
(ii) It has been in operation within an economic redevelopment area
or a qualified census tract for at least three years;
(iii) At least seventy-five percent of its service recipients are
located in an economic redevelopment area or a qualified census tract;
and
(iv) The demographic composition of its leadership and staff
reflects the economic redevelopment area or qualified census tract in
which it operates.
(c) Any microloan delivery organization, microloan technical
assistance organization, or innovation hub receiving funding under this
subsection shall engage in proactive and continuous community engagement
by:
(i) Establishing a formal advisory group of community members;
(ii) Holding public forums or town hall meetings at least twice per
year to solicit input and share progress updates; and
(iii) Incorporating community feedback into its program delivery
plans.
(d) The department shall:
(i) Create specific grant application criteria for microloan
delivery organizations, microloan technical assistance organizations, and
innovation hubs applying for grants under this subsection;
(ii) Develop standardized reporting requirements for grantees under
this subsection to assess the effectiveness of such grantees in serving
economic redevelopment areas and qualified census tracts; and
(iii) Conduct annual reviews to ensure compliance with this
subsection and to monitor the effectiveness of the grants awarded under
this subsection in meeting community needs.
(6) The department shall contract with a statewide microenterprise
development assistance organization to carry out this section.
-6-

LB47 LB47
2025 2025
(7) (5) Each year the department may award up to three million
dollars under this section.
Sec. 3. Section 81-12,233, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,233 For purposes of the Small Business Assistance Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Economic Development; and
(2) Economic redevelopment area means an area in the State of
Nebraska in which:
(a) The average rate of unemployment in the area during the period
covered by the most recent federal decennial census or American Community
Survey 5-Year Estimate by the United States Bureau of the Census is at
least one hundred fifty percent of the average rate of unemployment in
the state during the same period; and
(b) The average poverty rate in the area is twenty percent or more
for the federal census tract in the area;
(3) Qualified census tract means a qualified census tract as defined
in 26 U.S.C. 42(d)(5)(B)(ii)(I), as such section existed on January 1,
2025; and
(4) (2) Small business means a business with five or fewer
employees.
Sec. 4. Section 81-12,234, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-12,234 (1) The department shall create and administer a grant
program to:
(a) Provide grants of up to twenty-five thousand dollars to
individuals looking to start a small business. An individual shall be
eligible for a grant under this subdivision if the following requirements
are met:
(i) The individual earned no more than fifty-five thousand dollars
in the most recently completed calendar year;
(ii) The individual has a personal net worth of no more than two
-7-

LB47 LB47
2025 2025
hundred thousand dollars, excluding the individual's primary residence;
and
(iii) The individual does not have an ownership interest in any
other business; and
(b) Provide grants of up to twelve thousand five hundred dollars to
individuals who own a small business that has been in existence for no
more than five years. An individual shall be eligible for a grant under
this subdivision if the following requirements are met:
(i) The gross revenue of the small business has grown by no more
than twenty-five percent over the most recently completed calendar year;
(ii) The individual has a personal net worth of no more than two
hundred thousand dollars, excluding the individual's primary residence;
and
(iii) The individual does not have an ownership interest in any
other business.
(2)(a) (2) The department shall contract with one or more private
entities a private entity to provide professional counseling services to
individuals who are looking to start a small business in an economic
redevelopment area or a qualified census tract or who have started a
small business in an economic redevelopment area or a qualified census
tract within the previous five years. Such counseling services shall be
in the following areas:
(i) (a) Accounting and budgeting;
(ii) (b) Tax return preparation;
(iii) (c) Human resources;
(iv) (d) How to write a business plan;
(v) (e) Payroll processes;
(vi) (f) Financial planning and investments;
(vii) (g) Debt management;
(viii) (h) Strategic planning;
(ix) (i) Technology coaching; and
-8-

LB47 LB47
2025 2025
(x) (j) Financial statement review.
(b) Contracts under this subsection shall be awarded on a
competitive basis to ensure that services are delivered equitably and
effectively. The department may prioritize private entities with
demonstrated experience in serving economic redevelopment areas and
qualified census tracts.
(c) To ensure comprehensive geographic coverage and equitable
service delivery, the department may contract with a different private
entity for each of the state's three congressional districts. Each
contracted entity must demonstrate the capacity to address the unique
needs of the communities within the applicable district.
(d) The department shall establish clear performance-based criteria
for the private entities with which the department contracts under this
subsection. Such criteria shall include, but not be limited to:
(i) The number of individuals served;
(ii) Client satisfaction metrics;
(iii) Demonstrated improvement in business outcomes for individuals
receiving professional counseling services;
(iv) Geographic reach and accessibility of services; and
(v) Regular reporting and accountability measures to ensure
compliance and effectiveness.
(e) If a private entity fails to meet the established performance-
based criteria described in subdivision (d) of this subsection, the
department may terminate the contract and solicit new proposals to ensure
continuous service delivery.
(3) The private entity with which the department contracts under
subsection (2) of this section shall not have any other contracts with
the state that involve the provision of services described in subsection
(2) of this section.
Sec. 5. Section 81-12,235, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-9-

LB47 LB47
2025 2025
81-12,235 (1) On or before October 1, 2024, and on or before October
1 of each even-numbered year thereafter, the department shall submit a
report to the Governor and the Legislature that includes, but is not
limited to:
(a) A description of the demand for grants and counseling services
under the Small Business Assistance Act from all geographic regions in
Nebraska;
(b) A listing of the grant recipients and the amounts of grants
awarded pursuant to the act in the previous two fiscal years;
(c) A listing of the recipients of counseling services under the act
in the previous two fiscal years; and
(d) The impact of the grants provided under the act, including
information on:
(i) The number of jobs created;
(ii) The economic impact on the area where the grant recipient is
located;
(iii) The impact on state and local tax revenue; and
(iv) The types of businesses created, listed by industry.
(2) The report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically.
(3) The department may require any the private entity with which the
department contracts under described in section 81-12,234 and any
recipients of grants or counseling services to provide periodic reports
and information to enable the department to fulfill the requirements of
this section.
(4) The report shall contain no information that is protected by
state or federal confidentiality laws.
Sec. 6. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 7. Original sections 81-12,153, 81-12,162, 81-12,233,
81-12,234, and 81-12,235, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are
repealed.
-10-

LB47 LB47
2025 2025
Sec. 8. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-11-